Utah statutes.
51-9-406.   Victims of Domestic Violence Services Account established --
Funding -- Uses.
(1)  There is created a restricted account in the General Fund known as the
Victims of Domestic Violence Services Account.
(2) (a)  The Division of Finance shall allocate to the Victims of Domestic
Violence Services Account from the collected surcharge established in Section
51-9-401:
(i)  4% for the Division for Domestic Violence Services, but not to exceed the
amount appropriated by the Legislature; and
(ii)  .5% for the Office of the Attorney General, but not to exceed the amount
appropriated by the Legislature.
(b)  The attorney general shall use the allocation for training municipal and
county attorneys in the prosecution of domestic violence offenses.
